New York, session 2025-2026, S3978.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 807 2 to read as follows: 3 § 807. Emergency release during a time of crisis. 1. During a state 4 disaster emergency, as defined in article two-B of the executive law, 5 which places the lives, health or well-being of people in custody at 6 risk, the commissioner shall have the authority to release to community 7 supervision any person in custody who: 8 (a) is within two years of their earliest release date, has a reason- 9 ably stable living situation upon release, does not pose an unreasonable 10 public safety risk and appears to be rehabilitated, is immunocompromised 11 or has a disability as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision twenty- 12 one of section two hundred ninety-two of the executive law; 13 (b) is a pregnant person or a person participating in the nursery 14 program at a correctional facility who does not pose an unreasonable 15 public safety risk and has a reasonably stable living situation upon 16 release; or 17 (c) is a person over the age of fifty-five that has completed at least 18 one half of their term or minimum term of sentence who has a reasonably 19 stable living situation upon release and does not pose an unreasonable 20 public safety risk. 21 2. Any individual released under these emergency circumstances shall 22 remain under community supervision, unless such supervision is revoked 23 pursuant to subdivision three of section two hundred fifty-nine-i of the 24 executive law, for the remainder of their sentence or until such time EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08317-01-5 S. 3978 2 1 that the commissioner decides it is appropriate to terminate such super- 2 vision pursuant to the limitations set forth in section two hundred five 3 of this chapter. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.